Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 7 Superior Court Judges, District Attorneys, Assistant
District Attorneys, Employees of the
Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council

47-2-260.
Continuation of membership, rights, and benefits of judges of superior courts and district attorneys; notice of election to continue membership; contributions.

The provisions of this or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, on and after April 1, 1969, any person appointed or elected as a judge of the superior court or as a district attorney who at the time of such appointment or election is a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall be entitled to elect to continue as a member of the retirement system while holding office as a judge of the superior court or district attorney. All rights, credits, and funds in the retirement system which are possessed by any such member at the time of the member’s appointment or election shall be continued in force and the member shall be entitled to all rights and benefits under the retirement system to which the member was entitled at the time of the member’s appointment or election and to all rights subsequently acquired.

Within 30 days after appointment or election as a judge of the superior court or as a district attorney, any such person who elects to continue as a member of the retirement system shall notify the director of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia or the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, as appropriate, of that decision. Upon making such election and giving the required notice, a member who is subject to the provisions of this Code section shall not be required to become a member of or make contributions to the Georgia Judicial Retirement System created by Chapter 23 of this title.

Employee contributions, including contributions for retirement allowances, survivors benefits under Code Section 47-2-128, and social security coverage, of members referred to in this Code section shall be deducted by The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia or the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, as appropriate, from the compensation paid by the state to such members and remitted to the retirement system.

The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia and the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia are authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated or otherwise made available for the operation of the judicial branch of government of this state the required employer contributions, including contributions for retirement allowances, survivors benefits under Code Section 47-2-128, and social security coverage, and to remit those contributions to the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 829, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 347, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 1/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (b) and the middle of subsection (c), substituted “Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia or the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, as appropriate,”
for “Department of Administrative Services”; and, in subsection (d), substituted “Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia and the Prosecuting Attorney’s Council of the State of Georgia are” for “Department of Administrative Services is” near the beginning.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “The Council” for “the Council” in subsections (b) and (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-2-261.
[Reserved] Transfer of credits and funds from the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia upon employment by an agency subject to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 29, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1956, p. 54, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1697, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-262.
Membership in retirement system of assistant district attorneys and employees of the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council; notice of election to become a member; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Assistant district attorneys” means assistant district attorneys who are compensated from state funds pursuant to Code Section 15-18-14.

“Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” means the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia created by Article 2 of Chapter 18 of Title 15.

Each assistant district attorney and each employee of the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, hereinafter in this Code section collectively referred to as “employee” or “employees,” who becomes an employee on or after July 1, 1979, shall become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia as a condition of his or her employment, unless he or she is eligible for membership in another publicly supported retirement or pension system or fund which provides retirement benefits based wholly or partially on compensation of such employee paid from state funds. An employee who is eligible for membership in any such other publicly supported retirement or pension system or fund may elect to become a member of the retirement system in lieu of membership in such other publicly supported retirement or pension system or fund by notifying the board of trustees of such election within 90 days after becoming employed with the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia. Any such employee who fails to notify the board of trustees within such time shall not at any time thereafter be eligible for membership in the retirement system. The state salary paid to employees who become members of the retirement system shall be the basis for employee and employer contributions for such employees. All employer contributions required by this chapter for such members shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available. The Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia shall deduct from the state salaries payable to such members the employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 2173, § 22; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 586, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 2/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 30/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (b), in the fourth sentence, inserted “or her” and inserted “or she”, in the eighth sentence, substituted “available” for “made available for the operation of the superior courts” at the end, and, in the last sentence, substituted “Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services”.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “employed on June 30, 1979, may elect to become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Any such employee electing to become a member of the retirement system shall so notify the board of trustees not later than October 1, 1979. Any such employee who failed to notify the board of trustees by that date shall not at any time thereafter be eligible for membership in the retirement system. Any person” following “’employees,”’ in the middle of the present first sentence of subsection (b); and deleted former subsection (c), which read: “Any person who was required to become a member of this retirement system by operation of subsection (b) of this Code section but who failed to do so at the time he or she was so required because of an administrative error may receive creditable service for all or a portion of such period of prior service by paying to the board of trustees an amount which would warrant the grant of creditable service without creating any additional actuarial accrued liability as to the retirement system. Such payment may include a transfer of funds from a money purchase pension plan maintained by the employee’s employer prior to July 1, 2004, which shall be credited to the employee’s annuity account established by the retirement system. The employee’s employer is authorized to supplement such amount.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-263.
Credit for certain past service as an assistant district attorney or employee of the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council; payment of employee contributions; credit for service as full-time law assistant.

As used in this Code section, “past service as an assistant district attorney” shall include service rendered in that position pursuant to an Act authorizing assistant district attorneys in certain judicial circuits, Ga. L. 1970, p. 716, as amended, notwithstanding its subsequent repeal.

Any member who is subject to Code Section 47-2-262 may receive creditable service under this chapter for past service as an assistant district attorney or as an employee of the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia upon payment to the board of trustees of the employee contributions which he would have paid had he been a member of the retirement system at the time such past service was rendered. The basis for employee contributions to obtain creditable service under this Code section shall be the state salary paid to the members claiming such past service at the time the service was rendered.

Any member who is subject to Code Section 47-2-262 may receive up to four years of creditable service under this chapter for past service as a full-time law assistant for a judicial circuit employed pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 15-6-28 upon payment to the board of trustees of such amount as determined by the actuary as necessary to grant such benefit without creating any accrued actuarial liability as to this retirement system. The basis for employee contributions to obtain creditable service under this Code section shall be the state salary paid to the member claiming such past service at the time the service was rendered. Such payment must be made not later than July 1, 2003, or within six months of first or again becoming a member, whichever is later.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 2173, § 23; Ga. L. 1998, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1483, § 1.

47-2-264.
Membership in retirement system of secretaries employed by judges of superior courts and district attorneys; creditable service; contributions.

Each secretary employed by a judge of the superior court or a district attorney under Code Section 15-6-25 or 15-18-17 shall be a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia with a commencement date of July 1, 1975. Any such secretary who is already a member of the retirement system by virtue of service with another employer shall be entitled to credit for all service rendered while an employee under the retirement system. All contributions required under this chapter made on behalf of such judicial secretaries shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available for the operation of the superior courts, and all contributions required under this chapter made on behalf of such secretaries of district attorneys shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available. All such payments shall be in addition to the regular compensation provided by law for such secretaries.

Any member who is a secretary of a judge of the superior court or a district attorney and who was employed as such a secretary prior to July 1, 1993, may receive creditable service under this chapter for such employment prior to July 1, 1993, as provided in this subsection. In order to obtain creditable service under this subsection, the member shall (1) provide to the board of trustees acceptable evidence of the period prior to July 1, 1993, during which the member was employed as a secretary of a judge of the superior court or a district attorney but was not a member of this retirement system or any other retirement system and of the compensation received by the member for such employment; and (2) pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions which would have been required if such person had been a member of the retirement system during such period of employment, together with interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum from the date such employee contributions would have been due. The basis for computing such employee contributions shall be the compensation actually received and established to the board as provided in this subsection. No creditable service shall be allowed under this subsection for any period of employment for which creditable service is allowed under any other provision of this chapter or for which creditable service is received under any provision of any other retirement or pension system of this state or of any political subdivision of this state.

Any member who became a member by operation of this Code section shall be eligible to obtain creditable service for all prior service as a secretary of a state court judge while covered by a retirement or pension system operated by a county for county employees if such person has not yet begun receiving a retirement or disability benefit from such retirement or pension system. To obtain such creditable service, the member must apply to the board of trustees not later than December 31, 1998, or within six months after becoming a member, whichever date is later, and must provide such evidence of such prior service as the board deems necessary. Upon notification in writing by the board of trustees of this retirement system, the board of trustees or other managing body of the local retirement or pension system shall transfer to this retirement system accumulated employee contributions and accumulated interest which have been credited by the local retirement or pension system to each employee and have not been withdrawn, and thereafter such person shall not be entitled to receive a benefit from such local retirement or pension system. The employee shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system any employee contributions which have been paid to the local retirement or pension system by or on behalf of each employee and have been withdrawn from the local retirement or pension system, plus interest thereon at the rate of 5 percent per annum. Upon receipt of the funds so transferred, the board of trustees shall grant to the member such creditable service as such amount will provide without creating any accrued liability, as a result of granting such creditable service, against this retirement system. If the amount of creditable service so obtained is less than the actual number of years of eligible service, the member is authorized, but not required, to obtain the difference by paying to the board of trustees an amount sufficient to grant such creditable service without creating any accrued liability, as a result of granting such creditable service, against this retirement system.

Any member of this retirement system subject to the provisions of this Code section may obtain creditable service for prior service as a secretary to a state court judge while a participating member of a county retirement system by so notifying the board of trustees of this retirement system and the board of trustees of the county retirement system. Upon receiving such notice, the board of trustees of the county retirement system shall transfer to the board of trustees of this retirement system all employer and employee contributions made by or on behalf of the member, together with regular interest thereon. Upon receipt of such funds, the member shall be credited with such years of service, not to exceed the years of actual service as secretary for a state court judge, as such amount will warrant without creating any unfunded actuarial accrued liability.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1506, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1250, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 708, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1109, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1271, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 3/SB 109.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (a), in the third sentence, inserted “made on behalf of such judicial secretaries” in the middle and inserted “contributions required under this chapter made on behalf of such secretaries of district attorneys shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available.” at the end, and, at the beginning of the last sentence, added “All”.

47-2-264.1.
Membership in retirement system of employees paid by the office of the district attorney; contributions; creditable service.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Circuit paid district attorney employee” means any full-time assistant district attorney, secretary, investigator, clerical assistant, paraprofessional, or victim or witness assistance personnel employed by a district attorney of a multicounty judicial circuit from funds paid for the operation of such office by the counties of such judicial circuit and who is not eligible for membership in a county retirement system.

“State paid district attorney employee” means any full-time assistant district attorney, secretary, or investigator employed by a district attorney who is a member of this retirement system pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-262, 47-2-264, or 47-2-265.

Upon the enactment of a rule or regulation of each of the counties composing a judicial circuit so authorizing, a circuit paid district attorney employee may, at his or her option, elect to become a member of this retirement system. Once such a rule or resolution is adopted by each county in the judicial circuit, no revocation shall be effective until the rule or resolution is revoked in each such county, and any revocation of the privilege imparted thereby shall not apply to any employee employed prior to the effective date of such revocation. Any such employee shall exercise his or her option to become a member of this retirement system by so notifying the board of trustees not later than 60 days after becoming eligible, and, once made, such election shall be irrevocable. The employing district attorney’s office shall deduct from each such member’s compensation the member’s contribution, and the employing district attorney’s office shall pay the employer’s contribution from funds paid to such office by the counties composing the judicial circuit.

Any person electing to become a member of this retirement system pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334; provided, however, that any member who, without a break in service, accepts employment as a circuit paid district attorney employee shall continue in the same membership status possessed by the member immediately prior to accepting such employment without any interruption in membership and without the loss of any creditable service.

Any member who becomes a member of this retirement system pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be entitled to receive up to five years of creditable service for prior service as a circuit paid district attorney employee during which the member was not a member of any other public retirement system as provided in this subsection. In order to receive such creditable service, the member shall provide the board of trustees with proof satisfactory to the board of the period of employment as a circuit paid district attorney employee and the compensation received during that time and shall pay to the board of trustees the employer and employee contributions which would have been paid by or on behalf of such member if he or she had been a member, together with regular interest thereon. The employing district attorney’s office is authorized to supplement such payments from such funds as are available to it from the counties composing the judicial circuit. The member shall receive such creditable service as may be granted without creating any accrued unfunded liability of this retirement system.

Any state paid district attorney employee who is a member of this retirement system on July 1, 1998, shall be entitled to receive up to five years of creditable service for prior service as a circuit paid district attorney employee during which the member was not a member of any other public retirement system as provided in this subsection. In order to receive such creditable service, the member shall provide the board of trustees with proof satisfactory to the board of the period of employment as a circuit paid district attorney employee and the compensation received during that time and shall pay to the board of trustees the employer and employee contributions which would have been paid by or on behalf of such member if he or she had been a member, together with regular interest thereon. The employing district attorney’s office is authorized to supplement such payments from such funds as are available to it from the counties composing the judicial circuit. The member shall receive such creditable service as may be granted without creating any accrued unfunded liability of this retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-264.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 162, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 20, § 1.

47-2-265.
Membership in retirement system of district attorney investigators.

As used in this Code section, the term “district attorney investigator” means a district attorney investigator who is compensated from state funds pursuant to Code Section 15-18-14.1.

Effective on July 1, 1988, or on first becoming a district attorney investigator at any time after that date, each district attorney investigator shall become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia as a condition of employment, unless such investigator was, immediately prior to appointment as a district attorney investigator, a member of another publicly supported retirement or pension system or fund which provides retirement benefits based wholly or partially on compensation paid from state funds. A district attorney investigator who was employed as an investigator in a district attorney’s office prior to appointment as a district attorney investigator and who was a member of any such other publicly supported retirement or pension system or fund immediately prior to such appointment may elect to become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia in lieu of membership in such other publicly supported retirement or pension system or fund by notifying the board of trustees of such election within 90 days after becoming employed pursuant to Code Section 15-18-14.1. Any such district attorney investigator who fails to notify the board of trustees within such time shall not at any time thereafter become eligible for membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia during such service as a district attorney investigator.

Any person who becomes a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334, except that any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, is appointed as a district attorney investigator shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

The state salaries paid to district attorney investigators who become members of the retirement system pursuant to this Code section shall be the basis for employee and employer contributions to the retirement system for such members. All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter for such members shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available. The Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia shall deduct from the state salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

Any member who became a member by operation of this Code section shall be eligible to obtain creditable service for all prior service as such district attorney investigator prior to becoming a member of this retirement system. To obtain such creditable service, the member must apply to the board of trustees not later than December 31, 2000, or within six months after becoming a member, whichever date is later, and must provide such evidence of such prior service as the board deems necessary. The employee shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system any employee and employer contributions which would have been paid to this retirement system had such employee been a member of this retirement system at the time such service was rendered plus interest thereon at the rate of 5 percent per annum.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-265

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1338, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1217, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 4/SB 109.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (d), substituted “available” for “made available for the operation of the superior courts” at the end of the second sentence and substituted “Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” for “Department of Administrative Services” at the beginning of the last sentence.

47-2-266.
Membership of judicial employees; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Judicial employee” means:

A full-time assistant to a district administrative judge and any full-time secretarial or clerical judicial administrative district employee employed pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 15-5-6;

A full-time employee of The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia provided for in Code Section 15-6-34; and

A full-time court administrator for a judicial circuit employed pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 15-6-28.

“Prior service as a judicial employee” means service as a judicial employee rendered prior to July 1, 1990, or prior to July 1, 1992, as applied to a judicial employee specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Effective on July 1, 1990, or on July 1, 1992, as applied to a judicial employee specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(C) of this Code section, or on first becoming a judicial employee at any time after either such date, as applicable, each judicial employee shall become a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia as a condition of employment.

The salary paid from state funds to each judicial employee shall be the basis for employee and employer contributions to the retirement system for the purposes of this Code section. All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise made available for the operation of the judicial branch of the state government. Employee contributions of members under this Code section shall be deducted and remitted to the board of trustees by the appropriate employing authority.

Any person who was a member of the retirement system immediately prior to becoming a judicial employee and who has not withdrawn employee contributions from the retirement system shall receive full creditable service for membership service in the retirement system which was completed prior to becoming a judicial employee and shall have the same membership status in the retirement system which the person possessed immediately prior to becoming a judicial employee.

A person becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section may obtain creditable service for prior service as a judicial employee if the following payments are made to the board of trustees:

The person claiming the creditable service shall pay the employee contributions that would have been paid to the retirement system if the person had been a member during the period for which creditable service is claimed plus regular interest on such employee contributions compounded annually from the time the prior service was rendered to the date of payment; and

The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, the president of The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, or the district administrative judge employing the person claiming the creditable service shall pay the employer contributions that would have been paid to the retirement system if the person claiming the creditable service had been a member during the period of time for which creditable service is claimed plus regular interest on such employer contributions compounded annually from the time the prior service was rendered to the date of payment. For prior service as a judicial employee specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(C) of this Code section, the employer contributions plus interest required by this subparagraph shall be paid by The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia from funds appropriated or available for the operation of the superior courts.

The employee and employer contributions provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be determined on the basis of compensation actually received as a judicial employee during the period of prior service for which creditable service is claimed. The employer contributions plus interest thereon provided for in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection may be paid from any funds of the judicial branch of the state government appropriated or otherwise available to The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia or district administrative judges or appropriated or available for the operation of the superior courts.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-266

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 356, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2995, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 5/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 31/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services” near the end of the last sentence of subparagraph (f)(1)(B).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (a), added “and” at the end of subparagraph (a)(1)(B), deleted former subparagraph (a)(1)(C), which read: “A full-time employee employed for the purpose of assisting sentence review panels provided for in Code Section 17-10-6; and”, redesignated former subparagraph (a)(1)(D) as present subparagraph (a)(1)(C), and substituted “(C)” for “(D)” in paragraph (a)(2); substituted “subparagraph (a)(1)(C)” for “subparagraph (a)(1)(D)” near the middle of subsection (b); deleted former subsection (c), which read: “Any person becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334, except that any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, accepts employment as a judicial employee shall continue in the same membership status possessed by the member immediately prior to accepting such employment without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.”; redesignated former subsections (d) through (f) as present subsections (c) through (e), respectively; in present subsection (e), in the second sentence of subparagraph (e)(1)(B), substituted “subparagraph (a)(1)(C)” for “subparagraph (a)(1)(D)” and substituted “The” for “the”, and deleted former paragraph (e)(3), which read: “Any member qualified to obtain creditable service pursuant to the authority of subparagraph (a)(1)(D) of this Code section shall apply to the board of trustees for such creditable service by not later than July 1, 1993.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-267.
Membership of employees of district attorneys; contributions.

Except as provided in Code Section 47-2-265, each full-time employee of a district attorney, which employee is compensated through funds appropriated by the General Assembly, shall be a member of this retirement system as a condition of employment. Any such employee who is already a member of this retirement system by virtue of service with another employer shall be entitled to credit for all service rendered while an employee under the retirement system. All contributions required under this chapter shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available. The Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia shall deduct from the state salaries paid to such members the employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-267

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 172, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 6/SB 109.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “for the operation of the superior courts” following “available” at the end of the third sentence and substituted “Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” for “Department of Administrative Services” at the beginning of the last sentence.